  Interleukin Genetics                              IL-1 Genetic Patterns Translate Lp(a) Levels Into Cardiovascular EventsIn Patients with Elevated Lp(a), Recurrent Cardiovascular Events Are Conditional on Pro-Inflammatory IL-1 Genetic Patterns Watch Presentation Over 48 million U.S. adults have high Lipoprotein(a) levelsMost are unaware of their elevated risk for heart attackLearn More About Our Pipeline   Home Rene Oda 2017-04-03T17:21:14+00:00IL-1 Genetic Patterns & Lp(a)IL-1 genetic patterns translate Lp(a) levels into cardiovascular events. In patients with elevated Lp(a), recurrent cardiovascular events are conditional on pro-inflammatory IL-1 genetic patterns. Learn more in this presentation. Watch NowWhat is ILUSTRA?ILUSTRA is an innovative, integrated program that utilizes a simple genetic test to easily identify patients at elevated risk for developing severe periodontal disease due to a genetic tendency to over-produce inflammation. Learn MoreDevelopment PipelineOur patented IL-1 genetic risk test and our expanded cardiovascular genetic panel are providing key insights into prevention and treatment of cardiovascular disease and the overarching problems of systemic inflammation. Learn More                 Interleukin Genetics   –  About Interleukin Genetics                             About Interleukin Genetics About Interleukin Genetics Rene Oda 2016-10-20T11:21:12+00:00Interleukin Genetics, Inc. is a genetics-based personalized health company that develops genetic tests for use in the emerging personalized health market. Our vision is to build a leading personalized health and wellness company. We believe that the science of applied genetics can empower physicians and dentists to improve management of chronic diseases, and empower individuals to personalize their own health. In some diseases, such as osteoarthritis, our tests provide valuable information to assist in drug development. We currently have two primary focus areas to our business:Personalized health, which is focused on providing genetic information to physicians, dentists, and in some cases consumers.Research and development efforts focused on developing genetic tests linked to a partner’s products for marketing and sales into medical and dental channels.Both areas contribute toward our overall mission of providing products that can help individuals improve and maintain their health through preventive measures. We plan to pursue improving personalized healthcare for patients by:Processing genetic risk assessment tests in our CLIA-certified lab or in labs of sub licensees for ourselves or for partners; andDistributing existing and developing new genetic tests for use in multiple indications, countries and demographics. By providing important genetic information to our customers or identifying those individuals whose risk for certain chronic diseases may be increased due to variants in one or more genes and combining this knowledge with personalized interventions, we can help individuals improve their health outcomes. We believe that one of the great challenges confronting healthcare today is understanding why some people are more prone than others to develop various medical conditions and why some people respond to treatments for those conditions differently than others. Until individuals or their doctors are able to understand the underlying causes of such variability, healthcare will remain largely constrained to the current approach of broad treatment rather than customized prevention.Until recently, scientific studies of chronic health conditions have largely focused on identifying factors that are causative. Common examples of such factors include high levels of cholesterol in the case of heart disease, bacteria in the case of periodontal disease and reduced estrogen levels in the case of osteoporosis. However, the mere presence of these initiating factors does not necessarily mean a person will develop an illness. Many common conditions arise in part as a result of how our bodies are modified by various environmental factors to respond differently. In 2009, Interleukin Genetics launched the Inherent Health® Brand of genetic tests offering clear and personalized insights to wellness. Additionally, with this brand launch, Interleukin Genetics launched the Inherent Health Weight Management Test that includes personalized guidance on specific diet and exercise choices that may have the highest impact on weight loss.  Interleukin is now working to develop other genetic risk assessment tests for other common disorders, such as osteoarthritis. Moving forward, the company will expand its genetic testing through other consumer and professional channels.               Interleukin Genetics   –  Press Releases                             Press ReleasesInterleukin Genetics To Explore Strategic Alternatives, Reduce WorkforceWALTHAM, Mass. – July 3, 2017 – Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU) today announced that it will pursue strategic alternatives for the Company and will reduce the Company’s workforce by five employees (63%) as part of a plan to reduce operating costs.“While this decision was extremely difficult, it is important to preserve capital as we assess our options,” said Mark Carbeau, Chief Executive Officer of Interleukin Genetics. “I and the other Board members are personally grateful to our departing employees and the exceptional team members throughout the history of the Company who have advanced the contributions that Interleukin Genetics has made to precision medicine and to the advancement of inflammation science broadly.”The Company was unable to secure a clinical […]Interleukin Genetics Reports First Quarter 2017 Financial ResultsFocus on Advances in Cardiovascular Testing PlatformWALTHAM, Mass. – May 12, 2017 – Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU) today announced financial results for its first quarter of 2017, ended March 31, 2017, and provided a corporate update.“We continued to advance our refined strategy that focuses on the potential utility of our Interleukin-1 (IL-1) genetic platform in the development of new classes of drugs for cardiac disease, and management of patients who have suffered previous cardiac events,” said Mark B. Carbeau, Chief Executive Officer of Interleukin Genetics. “We believe our proprietary genetic patterns have potential to accelerate clinical development through more targeted patient recruitment and may help address important questions such as dose responses, side-effect profiles and pricing/reimbursement strategies. Commercially, […]Interleukin Genetics Reports Fourth Quarter and Year-End 2016 Financial ResultsAnnounces Refined Business Strategy Focused on Advances in Cardiovascular Test Technology WALTHAM, MA – April 18, 2017 – Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU), a life sciences company focused on the genetics of chronic inflammation, today announced financial and operational results for its fiscal fourth quarter and full fiscal year ending December 31, 2016.“2016 was a pivotal year for Interleukin Genetics, as we generated compelling new data regarding the potential utility of our Interleukin-1 (IL-1) genetic platform in the development of new classes of drugs for cardiac disease, and management of patients who have suffered previous cardiac events,” said Mark B. Carbeau, Chief Executive Officer of Interleukin Genetics. “We believe our proprietary genetic patterns have potential to accelerate clinical development […]Interleukin-1 Genotypes Are Predictive of Cardiovascular Events  in Patients With Elevated Lipoprotein(a)Second Study Validates Role in Recurrent Cardiac EventsWALTHAM, MA – March 20, 2017 – Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU), a life sciences company focused on the genetics of chronic inflammation, announced today the presentation of clinical data from “The Ioannina Study” at the 66th Annual Scientific Session & Expo of the American College of Cardiology (ACC 2017) in Washington, DC that demonstrates the ability of certain interleukin-1 (IL-1) genetic patterns together with elevated lipoprotein (a) (Lp(a)) to predict recurrent atherosclerotic cardiac events. Dr. Bechlioulis and co-workers reported the new findings from the University Hospital of Ioannina (Greece) along with collaborators from the University of California at San Diego.In the longitudinal study (median time 43 months) of 1,084 patients who […]Interleukin Genetics Signs Second Employer Agreement in Pittsburgh RegionSpang & Company to Offer ILUSTRA™ to Employees Through Pittsburgh Business Group on Health CollaborationWALTHAM, MA – March 13, 2017 – Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU), a life sciences company focused on the genetics of chronic inflammation, announced today that it has signed an agreement with Spang & Company, a diversified manufacturing company, to offer the ILUSTRA Inflammation Management Program to their employees and their families as an enhancement to the company’s employee benefits plan.Spang & Company is an employer-member of the Pittsburgh Business Group on Health (PBGH), the region’s leading employer-led coalition and as a member received early access to the ILUSTRA Program. Under the terms of the agreement, ILUSTRA will be made available to all of Spang & […]Interleukin Genetics Establishes Partnership with Greater Philadelphia Business Coalition on HealthExpands Availability of the ILUSTRATM Inflammation Management Program with Deployment of First Employer in Philadelphia RegionWALTHAM, MA – March 2, 2017 – Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU), a life sciences company focused on the genetics of chronic inflammation, announced today that it has entered into a partnership with the Greater Philadelphia Business Coalition on Health (GPBCH) to make the ILUSTRA Inflammation Management Program available to GPBCH employer-members in the Philadelphia area as part of a company’s enhanced employee benefits plan.The collaboration is designed to introduce ILUSTRA to coalition members and to assist employer members in implementing and evaluating the innovative ILUSTRA program.“We’re proud to be working with GPBCH to educate its members on the health benefits that may result […]Interleukin Genetics Deploys ILUSTRATM Inflammation Management Program with mPulse Mobile EmployeesEnhanced Benefit Can Deliver Significant Health and Economic Value by Targeting Chronic InflammationWALTHAM, MA – February 23, 2017 – Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU), a life sciences company focused on the genetics of chronic inflammation, announced today that it has entered into a relationship with mPulse Mobile, a leader in mobile health engagement, to offer the ILUSTRA Inflammation Management Program to their employees as an enhancement to the company’s employee benefits plan.“This innovative program is a clear match with our company values and mission,” said Brian Chudleigh, Chief Financial Officer at mPulse Mobile. “Affecting behavioral change toward a healthy lifestyle is the key to realizing long-term health, wellness and reduced healthcare costs. I am impressed with the ILUSTRA program […]IG and PBGH Forge Relationship To Bring ILUSTRATM To Pittsburgh EmployersWALTHAM, MA – Feb 15, 2017 – Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU), a life sciences company focused on the genetics of chronic inflammation, announced today that it has entered into a relationship with the Pittsburgh Business Group on Health (PBGH) to offer the ILUSTRA™ Inflammation Management Program to PBGH employer-members in the Pittsburgh area as part of a company’s enhanced employee benefits plan.“PBGH is the region’s leading employer-led coalition designed to drive transparency in health care data, cost and quality. Western Pennsylvania has a history of health care innovation and we are delighted to be working together to build on this heritage,” said Mark Carbeau, Chief Executive Officer of Interleukin Genetics. “This relationship advances our commercial strategy by providing […]Interleukin Genetics Reports Third Quarter 2016 Financial ResultsWALTHAM, Mass. – November 15, 2016 – Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU) today announced financial results for its fiscal third quarter of 2016, ended September 30, 2016, and provided a corporate update.“Interleukin Genetics continued to advance our commercial plan to drive market adoption of our Inflammation Management Program, which we recently relaunched as ILUSTRA™, that includes the genetic risk test (formerly known as PerioPredict®) that enables the identification and improved management of inflammation for individuals who may have a genetic predisposition to over-produce Interleukin-1 (IL-1), a key mediator of inflammation,” said Mark B. Carbeau, Chief Executive Officer of Interleukin Genetics.  “During the third quarter, our focus was on integrating our expanded team to drive our commercial strategy and refining our […]Interleukin Genetics Announces Conference Call to Discuss Third Quarter 2016 Financial ResultsWALTHAM, MA – November 9, 2016 – Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU) announced today that it will host a conference call and webcast on Tuesday, November 15, 2016, at 8:30 a.m. Eastern Time to provide a corporate update and discuss the Company’s financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2016.Tuesday, November 15th, 8:30 a.m. Eastern Time Dial in (domestic):                   877-324-1976 Dial in (international):            631-291-4550 Conference ID:                         13333032 A live webcast will also be available at the Investors section of the Company’s website at www.ilgenetics.com.  The webcast will be archived following the call at www.ilgenetics.com.About Interleukin Genetics Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU) develops and markets proprietary genetic tests for chronic diseases and health-related conditions. The products empower individuals to prevent certain […]123Next               Interleukin Genetics   –  Presentations                             Presentations Presentations Rene Oda 2017-03-01T15:12:30+00:00The following presentation constitutes a free writing prospectus under the rules of the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), and should be read together with the preliminary prospectus dated June 7, 2016 included in the Registration Statement on Form S-1 (File No. 333-211361) filed with the SEC on June 7, 2016, which can be accessed through the following link: Form S1-/A.TitleLink                 Interleukin Genetics   –  News                             NewsStay up to date on the latest company news and scientific headlines.Interleukin Genetics To Explore Strategic Alternatives, Reduce WorkforceWALTHAM, Mass. – July 3, 2017 – Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU) today announced that it will pursue strategic alternatives for the Company and will reduce the Company’s workforce by five employees (63%) as part of a plan to reduce operating costs.“While this decision was extremely difficult, it is important to preserve capital as we assess our options,” said Mark Carbeau, Chief Executive Officer of Interleukin Genetics. “I and the other Board members are personally grateful to our departing employees and the exceptional team members throughout the history of the Company who have advanced the contributions that Interleukin Genetics has made to precision medicine and to the advancement of inflammation science broadly.”The Company was unable to secure a clinical […]Interleukin Genetics Reports First Quarter 2017 Financial ResultsFocus on Advances in Cardiovascular Testing PlatformWALTHAM, Mass. – May 12, 2017 – Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU) today announced financial results for its first quarter of 2017, ended March 31, 2017, and provided a corporate update.“We continued to advance our refined strategy that focuses on the potential utility of our Interleukin-1 (IL-1) genetic platform in the development of new classes of drugs for cardiac disease, and management of patients who have suffered previous cardiac events,” said Mark B. Carbeau, Chief Executive Officer of Interleukin Genetics. “We believe our proprietary genetic patterns have potential to accelerate clinical development through more targeted patient recruitment and may help address important questions such as dose responses, side-effect profiles and pricing/reimbursement strategies. Commercially, […]Interleukin Genetics Reports Fourth Quarter and Year-End 2016 Financial ResultsAnnounces Refined Business Strategy Focused on Advances in Cardiovascular Test Technology WALTHAM, MA – April 18, 2017 – Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU), a life sciences company focused on the genetics of chronic inflammation, today announced financial and operational results for its fiscal fourth quarter and full fiscal year ending December 31, 2016.“2016 was a pivotal year for Interleukin Genetics, as we generated compelling new data regarding the potential utility of our Interleukin-1 (IL-1) genetic platform in the development of new classes of drugs for cardiac disease, and management of patients who have suffered previous cardiac events,” said Mark B. Carbeau, Chief Executive Officer of Interleukin Genetics. “We believe our proprietary genetic patterns have potential to accelerate clinical development […]Interleukin-1 Genotypes Are Predictive of Cardiovascular Events  in Patients With Elevated Lipoprotein(a)Second Study Validates Role in Recurrent Cardiac EventsWALTHAM, MA – March 20, 2017 – Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU), a life sciences company focused on the genetics of chronic inflammation, announced today the presentation of clinical data from “The Ioannina Study” at the 66th Annual Scientific Session & Expo of the American College of Cardiology (ACC 2017) in Washington, DC that demonstrates the ability of certain interleukin-1 (IL-1) genetic patterns together with elevated lipoprotein (a) (Lp(a)) to predict recurrent atherosclerotic cardiac events. Dr. Bechlioulis and co-workers reported the new findings from the University Hospital of Ioannina (Greece) along with collaborators from the University of California at San Diego.In the longitudinal study (median time 43 months) of 1,084 patients who […]Interleukin Genetics Signs Second Employer Agreement in Pittsburgh RegionSpang & Company to Offer ILUSTRA™ to Employees Through Pittsburgh Business Group on Health CollaborationWALTHAM, MA – March 13, 2017 – Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU), a life sciences company focused on the genetics of chronic inflammation, announced today that it has signed an agreement with Spang & Company, a diversified manufacturing company, to offer the ILUSTRA Inflammation Management Program to their employees and their families as an enhancement to the company’s employee benefits plan.Spang & Company is an employer-member of the Pittsburgh Business Group on Health (PBGH), the region’s leading employer-led coalition and as a member received early access to the ILUSTRA Program. Under the terms of the agreement, ILUSTRA will be made available to all of Spang & […]Interleukin Genetics Deploys ILUSTRATM Inflammation Management Program with mPulse Mobile EmployeesEnhanced Benefit Can Deliver Significant Health and Economic Value by Targeting Chronic InflammationWALTHAM, MA – February 23, 2017 – Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU), a life sciences company focused on the genetics of chronic inflammation, announced today that it has entered into a relationship with mPulse Mobile, a leader in mobile health engagement, to offer the ILUSTRA Inflammation Management Program to their employees as an enhancement to the company’s employee benefits plan.“This innovative program is a clear match with our company values and mission,” said Brian Chudleigh, Chief Financial Officer at mPulse Mobile. “Affecting behavioral change toward a healthy lifestyle is the key to realizing long-term health, wellness and reduced healthcare costs. I am impressed with the ILUSTRA program […]IG and PBGH Forge Relationship To Bring ILUSTRATM To Pittsburgh EmployersWALTHAM, MA – Feb 15, 2017 – Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU), a life sciences company focused on the genetics of chronic inflammation, announced today that it has entered into a relationship with the Pittsburgh Business Group on Health (PBGH) to offer the ILUSTRA™ Inflammation Management Program to PBGH employer-members in the Pittsburgh area as part of a company’s enhanced employee benefits plan.“PBGH is the region’s leading employer-led coalition designed to drive transparency in health care data, cost and quality. Western Pennsylvania has a history of health care innovation and we are delighted to be working together to build on this heritage,” said Mark Carbeau, Chief Executive Officer of Interleukin Genetics. “This relationship advances our commercial strategy by providing […]Interleukin Genetics Reports Third Quarter 2016 Financial ResultsWALTHAM, Mass. – November 15, 2016 – Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU) today announced financial results for its fiscal third quarter of 2016, ended September 30, 2016, and provided a corporate update.“Interleukin Genetics continued to advance our commercial plan to drive market adoption of our Inflammation Management Program, which we recently relaunched as ILUSTRA™, that includes the genetic risk test (formerly known as PerioPredict®) that enables the identification and improved management of inflammation for individuals who may have a genetic predisposition to over-produce Interleukin-1 (IL-1), a key mediator of inflammation,” said Mark B. Carbeau, Chief Executive Officer of Interleukin Genetics.  “During the third quarter, our focus was on integrating our expanded team to drive our commercial strategy and refining our […]Interleukin Genetics Announces Conference Call to Discuss Third Quarter 2016 Financial ResultsWALTHAM, MA – November 9, 2016 – Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU) announced today that it will host a conference call and webcast on Tuesday, November 15, 2016, at 8:30 a.m. Eastern Time to provide a corporate update and discuss the Company’s financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2016.Tuesday, November 15th, 8:30 a.m. Eastern Time Dial in (domestic):                   877-324-1976 Dial in (international):            631-291-4550 Conference ID:                         13333032 A live webcast will also be available at the Investors section of the Company’s website at www.ilgenetics.com.  The webcast will be archived following the call at www.ilgenetics.com.About Interleukin Genetics Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB: ILIU) develops and markets proprietary genetic tests for chronic diseases and health-related conditions. The products empower individuals to prevent certain […]Interleukin Genetics Launches the ILUSTRA™ Inflammation Management ProgramEasy-to-deploy benefit enhancement can deliver significant health and economic value by targeting chronic inflammationWALTHAM, Mass., November 3, 2016 — Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (OTCQB:ILIU) a life science company focused on the genetics of chronic inflammation, today unveiled the  ILUSTRA™ Inflammation Management Program. The program targets individuals at elevated risk for severe periodontitis due to a genetic tendency to over-produce inflammation. Under supervision of a licensed dentist or physician, ILUSTRA is offered by employers and through select insurance carriers as an enhanced benefit that has potential to provide significant health and economic value by improving the management of chronic inflammation.ILUSTRA incorporates three components: 1) a simple yet technologically advanced genetic risk test; 2) targeted education to healthcare professionals to individualize care […]123Next               Interleukin Genetics   –  Education                             Education Education Rene Oda 2015-03-31T16:26:08+00:00 Glossary of Terms: A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Allele One of the variant sequences of a gene at a particular locus, or location, on a chromosome. Different alleles produce variation in inherited characteristics, such as hair color or blood type. In a person, one form of the allele (the dominant one) may be expressed more than another form (the recessive one). One is inherited from each parent. Buccal swab A non-invasive buccal brush or swab that, when rubbed on the inside of the cheek, collects cells for DNA analysis. This is a technique commonly used to collect DNA samples. Cholesterol Cholesterol is a soft, fat-like, waxy substance found in the bloodstream and in all your body's cells. Cholesterol is normally made by the liver and also supplied in the diet through animal products such as meats, poultry, fish and dairy products. It's an important part of a healthy body because it's used for producing cell membranes and some hormones, insulating nerves and serves other needed bodily functions. But too much cholesterol in the blood is a major risk for coronary heart disease, which leads to heart attack. Chromosome Packaged DNA and protein in cells. Human beings have 23 pairs of chromosomes. One-half of each pair is inherited from a parent. Cytokine A protein or peptide that serves as a communication signal to cells. Examples are interleukins, interferons, and tumor necrosis factors that facilitate the inflammatory response. Diagnostic A test which measures the active presence of a disease, a condition, or biomarkers of disease. DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid) DNA, the molecule inside the nucleus or core of each of the body’s trillions of cells, that carries genetic instructions for making living organisms. DNA is made up of sequences, or what is referred to as your genetic code. Each gene is the code or recipe for a single protein. Everyone has the same genes – in fact, 99.9% of everyone’s DNA is the same. Double-helix of the DNA DNA molecule shows two strands of DNA spiraling around each other like a big ladder twisted into a coil. DNA sequencing The process by which the exact order of the base pairs in a segment of DNA is determined. Gene A segment of DNA that contains the information necessary to make a protein. Gene A functional segment of DNA located in a specific region on a chromosome that directs the formation of a protein. Gene expression The process of converting the information encoded in the DNA into RNA (mRNA, tRNA, and rRNA); most genes are transcribed into "messenger" RNA (mRNA) and, ultimately, into a protein product. Genetic counseling A short-term educational counseling process for persons and families who have an inherited disease or who are at risk for such a disease. Genetic counseling provides persons with information about their condition and helps them make informed decisions. Genetic risk assessment Genetic risk assessment testing is intended to identify common genetic variations that produce varying biochemical responses that are directly involved in the underlying cause of a disease and are associated with adverse disease outcomes. Genetic variations that result in a biochemical imbalance and are associated with adverse clinical outcomes may provide further understanding as to why some people are more prone than others to developing serious chronic diseases and why some people respond to treatments for those diseases differently than others. By identifying these underlying biological mechanisms, preventive interventions can be targeted to help reinstate the biochemical balance which may help prolong health and wellness in these individuals. Genetics The study of inheritance patterns of specific traits. Genome The sum total of all the genetic information in an organism; its instruction book—the blueprint that directs the development and functioning of human beings and other organisms. Genomics The study of genes and their function. Genotype The genetic makeup of a person, as opposed to the phenotype, which is the physiological manifestation of the genotype and its expression. Heterozygote/heterozygous Possessing two different copies of a particular gene, e.g., two different alleles, one inherited from each parent; a heterozygous person is also called an allele carrier. High-density lipoprotein (HDL) Cholesterol and other fats can't dissolve in the blood. They have to be transported to and from the cells by special carriers called lipoproteins. Cholesterol HDL is known as the "good" cholesterol. The body makes HDL cholesterol for protection. It carries cholesterol away from the arteries. Studies suggest that high levels of HDL cholesterol reduce the risk of heart attack. In the average man, HDL cholesterol levels range from 40 to 50 mg/dL. In the average woman, they range from 50 to 60 mg/dL. HDL cholesterol that's less than 40 mg/dL is low. Low HDL cholesterol increases the risk for heart disease. Smoking, being overweight and being sedentary can all result in lower HDL cholesterol. The higher the HDL numbers the better (³60mg/dL). Homozygote/homozygous Possessing two identical copies of a particular gene, e.g., two identical alleles, one inherited from each parent. Human Genome Project An international research project to map each human gene and to completely sequence human DNA; the goals of the project have expanded to include sequencing the genomes of other organisms and to identifying the products of human genes and their functions. Locus/Loci Actual physical position of a gene or marker on a chromosome, a kind of gene address. Low-density lipoprotein (LDL) Cholesterol and other fats can't dissolve in the blood. They have to be transported to and from the cells by special carriers called lipoproteins. Cholesterol LDL is known as the "bad" cholesterol. Too much LDL cholesterol can clog arteries, increasing the risk of heart attack and stroke. The lower LDL cholesterol, the lower the risk. In fact, it’s a better gauge of risk than total blood cholesterol. LDL cholesterol will fall into one of these categories: Target Less than 100 mg/dL Near Optimal 100-129 mg/dL Borderline high 130-159 mg/dL High 160-189 mg/dL Very High ³190 mg/dL Multifactorial A pattern of inherited characteristics, such as physical traits or diseases, that results from the interaction of gene and the environment. Nutrigenetics The study of the mechanisms by which bioactive dietary components communicate with the genetic material and how genetic variation affects the interaction between these bioactive dietary components and the health and disease potential of a person. Nutrigenomics The study of the effects of bioactive dietary components on the genome, proteome (the sum total of all proteins), and metabolome (the sum of all metabolites) at a global, population level. Nutritional genomics A field of study focused on optimizing an individual’s genetic potential through understanding how genetic variations (SNPs) influence molecular pathways and define nutritional needs. Conversely, the field is focused on the influence of nutrition and lifestyle on the molecular expression of genetic variations. Includes nutrigenetics and nutrigenomics. Phenotype The observable traits of characteristics of an organism, such as hair color or weight, or the presence or absence of a disease. Phenotypic traits are not necessarily genetic. Polygenic Characteristic resulting from the combined action of alleles of more than one gene (eg, heart disease, diabetes, and some cancers). Such characteristics are inherited but they depend on the simultaneous presence of several alleles, which typically results in hereditary patterns that are more complex than those of single gene traits. Polymorphism A common variation among persons in the sequence of DNA; technically a locus is polymorphic when two or more of the alleles at this locus are present in >1% of the population. Risk assessment Testing or identification of risk factors (genetic, environmental, clinical or behavioral) that have been associated with increased susceptibility to a disease, adverse clinical outcome or health condition. Risk assessment does not claim that a person definitely will or will not develop a certain condition or disease. However, when risk factors are present the person is predisposed (increased likelihood) for the disease if he/she does not counteract them. When the non-genetic factors are removed or controlled that individual will have a better chance for long-term health. Signal transduction Process by which chemical or physical messages are communicated between the surface of a cell and its interior in a step-wise manner that results in a response by the cell. Single gene disorder An inherited condition caused by a mutant allele at a single locus in the DNA; such a trait is monogenic (eg, Duchenne muscular dystrophy and sickle cell disease). Single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNP) Pronounced “snip”. A variation in a single DNA nucleotide or code (recipe) for a protein. Most of the variation in people is due to SNPs There are millions of these in humans. However, only certain SNPs are functional, i.e., associated with a difference in molecular function significant enough to effect clinical measurements and risk of disease. Numbers are used to identify the chromosomal locations of SNPs and hetero – or homozygosity. Total blood cholesterol High cholesterol is a leading risk factor for heart disease. When there is too much cholesterol in your blood, cholesterol and other substances form plaques in the walls of your arteries. Over time, plaque causes "hardening of the arteries" so that arteries become narrowed and blood flow to the heart is slowed down. The blood carries oxygen to the heart, and if enough blood and oxygen cannot reach the heart, an individual may suffer chest pain. If the blood supply to a portion of the heart is completely cut off by a blockage, the result is a heart attack. Heart attacks most commonly occur when plaques become fragile and rupture. Then blood clots are formed and can completely cut off blood supply to a portion of the heart. High total cholesterol has no symptoms until a blockage occurs that can result in a heart attack if not corrected. In general, people who have a total cholesterol level of 240 mg/dL have twice the risk of coronary heart disease as people whose cholesterol level is 200 mg/dL. Total blood cholesterol will fall into one of these categories: Desirable – Less than 200 mg/dL Borderline high risk – 200-239 mg/dL High risk – 240 mg/dL and over Trait A characteristic associated with a gene that can be quantified or described, such as eye color, flower color, height, intelligence, or the presence/absence of an enzyme. Variation A change in DNA. Variations are often harmful, causing irreversible diseases, such as Huntington’s Chorea. However, some variations may not have an effect on living organisms; while others confer beneficial effects. References: American Heart Association. www.americanheart.org National Human Genome Research Institute of the National Institutes of Health. Talking glossary of genetic terms. (http://www.genome.gov/10002096) Technical Support: Interleukin Genetics is committed to deliver top quality product information and educational materials available to help facilitate the use of its genetic tests by healthcare professionals and consumers. This includes technical support from qualified staff including medical geneticists, and genetic counselors are available to help with the interpretation and communication of results. This information may also be useful to your specific physician who is interested in obtaining more information about how genetic testing is integral to a personalized health program. Inherent Health Genetic Tests PerioPredict Genetic Risk Test Customer Support: support@inherenthealth.com 1-866-990-GENE (4363)               Interleukin Genetics   –  About Interleukin Genetics                             About Interleukin Genetics About Interleukin Genetics Rene Oda 2016-10-20T11:21:12+00:00Interleukin Genetics, Inc. is a genetics-based personalized health company that develops genetic tests for use in the emerging personalized health market. Our vision is to build a leading personalized health and wellness company. We believe that the science of applied genetics can empower physicians and dentists to improve management of chronic diseases, and empower individuals to personalize their own health. In some diseases, such as osteoarthritis, our tests provide valuable information to assist in drug development. We currently have two primary focus areas to our business:Personalized health, which is focused on providing genetic information to physicians, dentists, and in some cases consumers.Research and development efforts focused on developing genetic tests linked to a partner’s products for marketing and sales into medical and dental channels.Both areas contribute toward our overall mission of providing products that can help individuals improve and maintain their health through preventive measures. We plan to pursue improving personalized healthcare for patients by:Processing genetic risk assessment tests in our CLIA-certified lab or in labs of sub licensees for ourselves or for partners; andDistributing existing and developing new genetic tests for use in multiple indications, countries and demographics. By providing important genetic information to our customers or identifying those individuals whose risk for certain chronic diseases may be increased due to variants in one or more genes and combining this knowledge with personalized interventions, we can help individuals improve their health outcomes. We believe that one of the great challenges confronting healthcare today is understanding why some people are more prone than others to develop various medical conditions and why some people respond to treatments for those conditions differently than others. Until individuals or their doctors are able to understand the underlying causes of such variability, healthcare will remain largely constrained to the current approach of broad treatment rather than customized prevention.Until recently, scientific studies of chronic health conditions have largely focused on identifying factors that are causative. Common examples of such factors include high levels of cholesterol in the case of heart disease, bacteria in the case of periodontal disease and reduced estrogen levels in the case of osteoporosis. However, the mere presence of these initiating factors does not necessarily mean a person will develop an illness. Many common conditions arise in part as a result of how our bodies are modified by various environmental factors to respond differently. In 2009, Interleukin Genetics launched the Inherent Health® Brand of genetic tests offering clear and personalized insights to wellness. Additionally, with this brand launch, Interleukin Genetics launched the Inherent Health Weight Management Test that includes personalized guidance on specific diet and exercise choices that may have the highest impact on weight loss.  Interleukin is now working to develop other genetic risk assessment tests for other common disorders, such as osteoarthritis. Moving forward, the company will expand its genetic testing through other consumer and professional channels.             



    ILIU Key Statistics - Interleukin Genetics Inc. Financial Ratios - MarketWatch




































Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Open in:



Market Snapshot
Analyst Ratings


















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































Interleukin Genetics Inc.

                  OTC: ILIU
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

Interleukin Genetics Inc.



Market closed
 --Quotes are delayed by 20 min
Jul 21, 2017, 5:19 p.m.


ILIU

/quotes/zigman/215186/delayed


$
0.01




Change

0.00
0.00%

Volume
Volume 27,908
Quotes are delayed by 20 min








/quotes/zigman/215186/delayed
Previous close

$
			0.01
		


$
				0.01
			
Change

0.00
0.00%





Day low
Day high
$0.01
$0.01










52 week low
52 week high

            $0.0088
        

            $0.25
        

















			Company Description 


			Interleukin Genetics, Inc. is a molecular diagnostics company which develops and commercializes genetic tests to guide better prevention and treatment of chronic diseases of aging. Its products include PrioPredict Genetic Risk Test, and Inherent Health. The company was founded by Kenneth S. Kornman ...
		


                Interleukin Genetics, Inc. is a molecular diagnostics company which develops and commercializes genetic tests to guide better prevention and treatment of chronic diseases of aging. Its products include PrioPredict Genetic Risk Test, and Inherent Health. The company was founded by Kenneth S. Kornman in 1986 and is headquartered in Waltham, MA.
            




Valuation

P/E Current
-0.31


P/E Ratio (with extraordinary items)
-0.33


Price to Sales Ratio
8.62


Enterprise Value to EBITDA
-0.56


Enterprise Value to Sales
2.05


Total Debt to Enterprise Value
0.15

Efficiency

Receivables Turnover
26.20


Total Asset Turnover
0.49

Liquidity

Current Ratio
0.59


Quick Ratio
0.58


Cash Ratio
0.48



Profitability

Gross Margin
34.93


Operating Margin
-265.51


Pretax Margin
-294.98


Net Margin
-294.98


Return on Assets
-143.58


Return on Total Capital
-505.05

Capital Structure

Total Debt to Total Capital
583.04


Total Debt to Total Assets
89.54


Long-Term Debt to Total Capital
191.84





      Officers and Executives
    



Name
Age
Officer Since
Title





Dr. Kenneth S. Kornman 
70
1986
President, Director & Chief Scientific Officer



Mr. Mark B. Carbeau 
55
2015
Chief Executive Officer & Director



Mr. Stephen J. DiPalma 
57
2014
Chief Financial Officer



Mr. Stephan  Toutain 
-
2016
Chief Commercial Officer



Ms. Mary  Hiter 
-
-
Marketing Director





Insider Actions


 – Purchase

 – Sale
1
 – Number of Transactions











{"OrganizationDocuments":[{"Documents":[{"document":[{"reportDateGroup":[{"reportDate":"2011-06-09","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"5","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-17","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"3","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-16","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"2","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"8","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-13","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-12","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-11","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-02","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-03-10","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"5","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-02-17","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"4","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"2","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-02-15","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"8","tradeType":"A"},{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]}]}]}]}]}


Date
Name
Shares
Transaction
Value





07/29/2016

Bay City Capital LLC                            


564,386


 
Acquisition at $0.1 per share.


56,438


07/29/2016

Bay City Capital LLC                            


29,616,700


 
Acquisition at $0.1 per share.


2,961,670


07/29/2016

Kenneth S. Kornman 
President and CSO; Director

25,150


 
Acquisition at $0.1 per share.


2,515


07/29/2016

Stephen J. DiPalma 
Interim CFO

100,603


 
Acquisition at $0.1 per share.


10,060


07/29/2016

James M. Weaver 
Director

100,603


 
Acquisition at $0.1 per share.


10,060


07/29/2016

Mark B. Carbeau 
Chief Executive Officer; Director

100,603


 
Acquisition at $0.1 per share.


10,060


12/23/2014

Bay City Capital LLC                            


495,400


 
Acquisition at $0.1 per share.


49,540


12/23/2014

Bay City Capital LLC                            


25,996,552


 
Acquisition at $0.1 per share.


2,599,655


12/23/2014

Stephen J. DiPalma 
Interim CFO

249,252


 
Acquisition at $0.1 per share.


24,925


05/17/2013

Alticor Global Holdings, Inc.                            


2,521,222


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $5.68 per share.


14,320,540


05/17/2013

Alticor Global Holdings, Inc.                            


28,160,200


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0








/news/latest/company/us/iliu

      MarketWatch News on ILIU
    
No News currently available for ILIU





/news/nonmarketwatch/company/us/iliu

      Other News on ILIU
    




 10-Q: INTERLEUKIN GENETICS INC
5:02 p.m. May 11, 2017
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




 10-K: INTERLEUKIN GENETICS INC
5:32 p.m. April 17, 2017
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Mark Baum on Q3 2016 Results - Earnings Call Transcript

12:11 p.m. Nov. 15, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Mark Carbeau on Q2 2016 Results - Earnings Call Transcript

1:29 p.m. Aug. 16, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha




 10-Q: INTERLEUKIN GENETICS INC
4:56 p.m. Aug. 15, 2016
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





InsiderInsights.com Daily Round Up 8/3/16: CB Richard Ellis Group, Shake Shack, Grubhub

1:44 p.m. Aug. 4, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





InsiderInsights.com Daily Round Up 8/2/16: SXC, INFN, CTIB, ILIU

12:09 p.m. Aug. 3, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Mark Carbeau on Q1 2016 Results - Earnings Call Transcript

10:52 a.m. May 16, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





Eleven Biotherapeutics: A Buyout Likely Coming

9:41 a.m. May 16, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





Eleven Bio continues up move on renewed optimism for isunakinra; shares up 35%

11:58 a.m. May 4, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Mark Carbeau on Q4 2015 Results - Earnings Call Transcript

1:01 p.m. March 17, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Mark Carbeau on Q2 2015 Results - Earnings Call Transcript

11:35 a.m. Aug. 14, 2015
 - Seeking Alpha





Premarket Biotech Digest: Lure Of Startups, Geron's Short Squeeze, New ODDs

8:36 a.m. July 16, 2015
 - Seeking Alpha





Interleukin's (ILIU) CEO Mark Carbeau on Q1 2015 Results - Earnings Call Transcript

10:21 a.m. May 15, 2015
 - Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Kenneth Kornman on Q4 2014 Results - Earnings Call Transcript

2:00 p.m. March 20, 2015
 - Seeking Alpha





InsiderInsights.com Daily Round Up 12/29/14: REGN, VRML, OAS, PTBI

2:23 p.m. Dec. 30, 2014
 - Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO, Kenneth Kornman on Q3 2014 Results - Earnings Call Transcript

12:24 p.m. Nov. 14, 2014
 - Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Ken Kornman on Q2 2014 Results - Earnings Call Transcript

10:15 p.m. Aug. 13, 2014
 - Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics CEO Discusses Q4 2013 Results - Earnings Call Transcript

11:05 p.m. March 20, 2014
 - Seeking Alpha





PST Manuscript Submitted, Awaiting Publication Acceptance - Analyst Blog

4:04 p.m. May 17, 2013
 - Zacks.com


Loading more headlines...












At a Glance

Interleukin Genetics, Inc.
135 Beaver Street


Waltham, Massachusetts 02452




Phone
1 7813980700


Industry
Biotechnology


Sector
Health Care/Life Sciences


Fiscal Year-end
12/2017


View SEC Filings




Revenue
$2.51M


Net Income
$-7.41M


2016 Sales Growth 
74.4%


Employees

        -


Annual Report for ILIU











/news/pressrelease/company/us/iliu

      Press Releases on ILIU
    




 Interleukin Genetics To Explore Strategic Alternatives, Reduce Workforce
8:00 a.m. July 3, 2017
 - GlobeNewswire




 Interleukin Genetics Reports First Quarter 2017 Financial Results
8:00 a.m. May 12, 2017
 - GlobeNewswire




 Interleukin Genetics Reports Fourth Quarter and Year-End 2016 Financial Results
8:01 a.m. April 18, 2017
 - GlobeNewswire




 Interleukin-1 Genotypes Are Predictive of Cardiovascular Events  in Patients With Elevated Lipoprotein (a)
8:00 a.m. March 20, 2017
 - GlobeNewswire




 Interleukin Genetics Signs Second Employer Agreement in Pittsburgh Region
8:00 a.m. March 13, 2017
 - GlobeNewswire




 Interleukin Genetics Establishes Partnership with Greater Philadelphia Business Coalition on Health
9:01 a.m. March 2, 2017
 - GlobeNewswire




 Interleukin Genetics Deploys ILUSTRA(TM) Inflammation Management Program with mPulse Mobile Employees
9:00 a.m. Feb. 23, 2017
 - GlobeNewswire




 Interleukin Genetics and Pittsburgh Business Group on Health Forge Relationship to Bring the ILUSTRA(TM) Inflammation Management Program to Pittsburgh Area Employers
9:00 a.m. Feb. 15, 2017
 - GlobeNewswire




 Interleukin Genetics Reports Third Quarter 2016 Financial Results
9:01 a.m. Nov. 15, 2016
 - GlobeNewswire




 Interleukin Genetics Announces Conference Call to Discuss Third Quarter 2016 Financial Results
9:00 a.m. Nov. 9, 2016
 - GlobeNewswire




 Interleukin Genetics Launches The ILUSTRA(TM) Inflammation Management Program
8:01 a.m. Nov. 3, 2016
 - GlobeNewswire




 Interleukin Genetics Cites Role in Key Antisense Drug Trial Published in The Lancet
8:00 a.m. Sept. 22, 2016
 - GlobeNewswire




 Interleukin-1 Genetic Variations Influence Obesity Effect in Periodontal Disease Progression
8:01 a.m. Aug. 23, 2016
 - GlobeNewswire




 Interleukin Genetics Reports Second Quarter 2016 Financial Results
8:00 a.m. Aug. 16, 2016
 - GlobeNewswire




 Interleukin Genetics Announces Conference Call to Discuss Second Quarter 2016 Financial Results
8:00 a.m. Aug. 9, 2016
 - GlobeNewswire




 Interleukin Genetics Strengthens Commercial Leadership with Key Appointments
8:01 a.m. Aug. 3, 2016
 - GlobeNewswire




 Interleukin Genetics, Inc. Announces $5.6 Million Private Placement Financing
8:00 a.m. Aug. 1, 2016
 - GlobeNewswire











Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




7:32 AM EDT
July 24, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Pre


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Open


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
7:32aThis app will analyze your DNA to help you lose weight
7:31aWebMD's stock resumes trade, rockets 20% premarket after buyout deal
7:31aHibbett Sports down 7% premarket after trading halt lifted
7:29aMersana Therapeutics started at overweight with $23 stock price target at J.P. Morgan
7:29aBrighthouse Financial started at neutral with $78 stock price target at J.P. Morgan
7:29aBlack swans? Here’s why the recent global breakout in stocks should NOT be trusted
7:28aMichaels Cos. upgraded to overweight from neutral at J.P. Morgan
7:26aExxon earnings: Will stock trade higher on expected second-quarter beat?
7:25aDova Pharmaceuticals started at market perform with $24 stock price target at Leerink
7:24aHuntsman upgraded to overweight from sector weight at KeyBanc Capital
7:23aUnion Pacific stock price target raised to $118 from $112 at Stifel Nicolaus
7:23aCSX stock price target raised to $57 from $50 at Stifel Nicolaus
7:22aChipotle earnings: Media coverage of the latest illness scare will put earnings targets at risk
7:22aBlue Apron started at buy with $10 stock price target at Stifel Nicolaus
7:20aVF Corp. shares rise after earnings, revenue beat expectations
7:18aAlphabet earnings: A $2.74 billion hit for Google, potential YouTube results for investors
7:17aGilead stock surges 0.7% on late-stage HIV trial results
7:17aGilead Sciences says late-stage results for HIV drug combination are similar to standard of care
7:16aKKR's stock jumps 3.2% premarket after WebMD buyout deal
7:15aVF Corp. shares up 2.3% premarket
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,580.07

-31.71
-0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,387.75

-2.25
-0.04%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.54

-0.91
-0.04%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15

























































Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (ILIU) - Product Pipeline Analysis, Trends, Share, Size Research Report

























866-997-4948(US-Canada Toll Free)

















Home




GlobalData




Market Guide




Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (ILIU) - Product Pipeline Analysis









Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (ILIU) - Product Pipeline Analysis
Published By : GlobalData
Published Date :  Aug 2012
Category : Market Guide
No. of Pages : 25 Pages

 



Description
Table of Content

Check Discount



Interleukin Genetics, Inc. (Interleukin) develops and distributes genetic tests for the personalized health market. The company offers its products and services under the brands Inherent Health and PCT. Inherent Health brand of genetic tests includes genetic tests in Weight Management, Heart Health, Bone Health and Nutritional Needs. PST Genetic Susceptibility Test is the genetic test that helps in identifying interleukin 1 genes that has variations leading to the periodontal disease. Its genetic test product pipeline include Osteoarthritis Genetic Test for osteoarthritis; and Periodontal Disease Genetic Test (version 2.0). These products help individuals in preventing certain chronic conditions. It distributes its products through partnership with healthcare professionals, health and wellness companies, and distribution channels. The company offers its products to individuals and pharmaceutical companies. Interleukin is headquartered in Waltham, Massachusetts, the US.

This report is a source for data, analysis and actionable intelligence on the Interleukin Genetics, Inc. portfolio of pipeline products. The report provides detailed analysis on each pipeline product with information on the indication, the development stage, trial phase, product milestones, pipeline territory, estimated approval date, and estimated launch date.

Each pipeline product is profiled to cover information on product description, function, technology, indication, and application. The report is also supplemented with a detailed company profile and information on clinical trials, wherever applicable.

This report is built using data and information sourced from proprietary databases, primary and secondary research and in-house analysis by GlobalDatas team of industry experts.

Scope



Detailed company profile with information on business description, key company facts, major products and services, key competitors, key employees, locations and subsidiaries and recent developments.
Detailed coverage on all the pipeline products, by equipment type, by therapy area, by development stage, and by trial phase.
Information on product milestones and pipeline territory for each product, the estimated approval date, and estimated launch date.
Profile of each pipeline product with additional information on product description, function, technology, indication(s), and application.
Data on relevant clinical trials and product patent details, wherever applicable.
Information on clinical trial, wherever applicable, is supplemented with information on trial phase, trial status, trial objective, trial design, target patients, unique physician identifier, primary point, secondary point, acronym, participants inclusion, participants exclusion, interventions, trial results, trial start date, trial end date, study type, trial site, trial funding, age eligibility, and gender eligibility.



Reasons to Buy



Develop business strategies by understanding the trends and developments driving the medical devices pipeline and technology landscape globally.
Design and develop your product development, marketing and sales strategies.
Exploit M&A opportunities by identifying market players with the most innovative pipeline.
Develop market-entry and market expansion strategies.
Exploit in-licensing and out-licensing opportunities by identifying products, most likely to ensure a robust return.
Identify emerging players with potentially strong product portfolio and create effective counter-strategies to gain competitive advantage.
Develop competition strategies by identifying the status and likely launch of your competitors pipeline products through review of the clinical trials, stage and phase of development, etc.
Which are the next high-value products that your competitor would add in its portfolio? identify, understand and capitalize.

 

Table of Content
Table of Contents  2List of Tables  3List of Figures  3Interleukin Genetics, Inc. - Business Description  4
Key Facts  5Interleukin Genetics, Inc. - Major Products and Services  6Interleukin Genetics, Inc. Pipeline Products by Equipment Type  7Interleukin Genetics, Inc. Pipeline Products by Development Stage  9Interleukin Genetics, Inc. Pipeline Products by Therapy Area  11Diagnostic Test - Skin Aging  13Diagnostic Test - Skin Aging Product Status  13Diagnostic Test - Skin Aging Product Description  13Diagnostic Test - Skin Aging Product Milestone  13Inherent Health Osteoarthritis Test  14Inherent Health Osteoarthritis Test Product Status  14Inherent Health Osteoarthritis Test Product Description  14Osteoporosis Risk Test  15Osteoporosis Risk Test Product Status  15Osteoporosis Risk Test Product Description  15PST Genetic Test - New Version  16PST Genetic Test - New Version Product Status  16PST Genetic Test - New Version Product Description  16Interleukin Genetics, Inc. - Key Competitors  17Interleukin Genetics, Inc. - Key Employees  18Interleukin Genetics, Inc. - Key Employee Biographies  19Interleukin Genetics, Inc. - Locations And Subsidiaries  20Head Office  20Recent Developments  21Interleukin Genetics, Inc., Recent Developments  21May 10, 2012: Interleukin Genetics Reports Q1 2012 Results  21Mar 29, 2012: Interleukin Genetics Reports Revenue Of $2.9m In 2011  21Dec 14, 2011: Interleukin Genetics Appoints Lynn Doucette-Stamm As Vice President Of Development  22Nov 10, 2011: Interleukin Genetics Reports Q3 2011 Results  22Aug 12, 2011: Interleukin Genetics Reports Q2 2011 Results  23May 12, 2011: Interleukin Genetics Reports Q1 2011 Results  23Mar 21, 2011: Interleukin Genetics Reports Total Revenues Of $2m In 2010  23
Appendix  25Methodology  25About GlobalData  25Contact Us  25Disclaimer  25 List of Table
Interleukin Genetics, Inc., Key Facts  1Interleukin Genetics, Inc. Key Pipeline Products by Equipment Type  1Interleukin Genetics, Inc. Key Pipeline Products by Therapy Area  1Interleukin Genetics, Inc. Key Pipeline Products by Development Stage  1Interleukin Genetics, Inc., Key Facts  5Interleukin Genetics, Inc., Major Products and Services  6Interleukin Genetics, Inc. Number of Pipeline Products by Equipment Type  7Interleukin Genetics, Inc. Pipeline Products by Equipment Type  8Interleukin Genetics, Inc. Number of Pipeline Products by Development Stage  9Interleukin Genetics, Inc. Pipeline Products by Development Stage  10Interleukin Genetics, Inc. Number of Pipeline Products by Therapy Area  11Interleukin Genetics, Inc. Pipeline Products by Therapy Area  12Diagnostic Test - Skin Aging - Product Status  13Diagnostic Test - Skin Aging - Product Description  13Diagnostic Test - Skin Aging - Product Milestone  13Inherent Health Osteoarthritis Test - Product Status  14Inherent Health Osteoarthritis Test - Product Description  14Osteoporosis Risk Test - Product Status  15Osteoporosis Risk Test - Product Description  15PST Genetic Test - New Version - Product Status  16PST Genetic Test - New Version - Product Description  16Interleukin Genetics, Inc., Key Employees  18Interleukin Genetics, Inc., Key Employee Biographies  19 
                                            List of Chart
Interleukin Genetics, Inc. Pipeline Products by Equipment Type  7Interleukin Genetics, Inc. Pipeline Products by Development Stage  9Interleukin Genetics, Inc. Pipeline Products by Therapy Area  11                







Make an enquiry before buying this Report
Please fill the enquiry form below.



Full Name *


Your Email *


Job Title *

Company *

Phone No. *
                                    (Pls. Affix Country Code)



Message

Security Code *

22835












 



Choose License Type : 

Select User License
Single License User $750
Multiple License User $1500







Do you wish to check sample of this report? Order a sample report.



Have query on this report?



Related News

Zinc Prices to Continue to Shoot as Hopes of Output Rise Remain Bleak


Shift to Cloud-based Products and Services Fares well for Microsoft


India Remains Leading Provider of Online Labors in Technology and Software Development Sector 


Flipkart’s PhonePe Ventures in India’s Offline Space


India Introduces First Train Powered by Solar Power 





Research Assistance
We will be happy to help you find what you need. Please call us or write to us:
866-997-4948
(US-Canada Toll Free)
Tel : +1-518-621-2074
	Email : sales@researchmoz.us
 









Letters to Manufacturers Concerning Genetic Tests





















































  


Skip to main page content
Skip to search
Skip to topics menu
Skip to common links




 
 







HHS
U.S. Department of Health and Human Services

 




  U.S. Food and Drug Administration

 
 




A to Z Index
Follow FDA
En Español


 




Search FDA


Submit search














 
 
 
 










Medical Devices






 

 






Home
Medical Devices

Products and Medical Procedures

In Vitro Diagnostics











Letters to Manufacturers Concerning Genetic Tests





Share


Tweet


Linkedin


Pin it


More sharing options


Linkedin


Pin it




Email


Print










Letters
Letter to Graceful Earth Inc. Concerning the Graceful Earth Alzheimer's Test (PDF - 96KB)


Letter to SeqWright DNA Technology Services, Inc. Concerning the SeqWright Genomic Profiling Service (GPS) (PDF - 100KB)


Letter to Interleukin Genetics, Inc. Concerning the Inerent Health (PDF - 111KB)


Letter to DNATraits Concerning the Ashkenazi Jews Genetic Disease Panel (PDF - 97KB)


Letter to CyGene Direct™ Concerning the Metabolic Health Assessment DNA Analysis Test (PDF - 111KB)


Letter to Consumer Genetics, LLC Concerning the AsthmaGEN DNA Test (PDF - 91KB)


Letter to Matrix Genomics, Inc. Concerning the Matrix Genomics Breast Cancer Panel (PDF - 101KB)


Letter to The Genetic Testing Laboratories, Inc. Concerning The Genetic Testing Laboratories DNA Predisposition Test (PDF - 96KB)


Letter to Sequenom, Inc. Concerning the SEQureDx™ (PDF - 86KB)


Letter to EnteroLab Reference Laboratory Concerning the Gene Test for Gluten Sensitivity/Celiac Sprue (PDF - 94KB)


Letter to BioMarker Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Concerning the Gene Essence™ (PDF - 90KB)


Letter to DNA Dimensions Concerning the Predisposition DNA Test (PDF - 90KB)


Letter to HealthCheckUSA Concerning the HealthCheckUSA Celiac Disease DNA Test (PDF - 96KB)


Letter to easyDNA Concerning the Genetic Predisposition Health Test (PDF - 92KB)

 








More in In Vitro Diagnostics
Companion Diagnostics

Laboratory Developed Tests

Tests Used In Clinical Care
Safety Issue on Magellan Diagnostics LeadCare Testing Systems

Home Use Tests
Cholesterol
Hepatitis C
Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV)
Menopause
Fecal Occult Blood
Ovulation (Saliva Test)
Ovulation (Urine Test)
Pregnancy
Prothrombin
Vaginal pH

Blood Glucose Monitoring Devices

Drugs of Abuse Tests
Drugs of Abuse Home Use Test
Drugs of Abuse (Collection Kit)

 
















	Page Last Updated: 12/19/2016


	Note: If you need help accessing information in different file formats, see Instructions for Downloading Viewers and Players.
   Language Assistance Available: Español | 繁體中文 | Tiếng Việt | 한국어 | Tagalog | Русский | العربية | Kreyòl Ayisyen | Français | Polski | Português | Italiano | Deutsch | 日本語 | فارسی | English






 















Interleukin Genetics Inc Executives, Organizational Chart, Company Profile Information, Contacts | Headquarters, Locations, News   












Submit

ContactCareersLogin

MENUtoggle
Our Difference Research Client SuccessWho We Serve Sales Professionals Marketing Professionals Executives Recruiting/Staffing ProfessionalsSolutions [Column]  ABM & ABS Actionable Intelligence Competitive Intelligence Customer Success & Retention  [Column]  Data Quality & Management Data Sets Integrations Lead Generation  [Column]  Predictive Analytics Sales & Marketing Alignment Targeting & Ranking Knowledge Hub Blog Case Studies Insights FAQsAbout Careers News Pricing

Menu

HomeOur Difference Research Client SuccessWho We Serve Sales Professionals Marketing Professionals Executives Recruiting/Staffing ProfessionalsSolutions ABM & ABS Actionable Intelligence Competitive Intelligence Customer Success & Retention Data Quality & Management Data Sets Integrations Lead Generation Predictive Analytics Sales & Marketing Alignment Targeting & RankingKnowledge Hub Blog Case Studies Insights FAQsAbout Careers News PricingGet a Free ProfileSchedule a DemoRequest PricingContact UsLogin
Home / Companies / Interleukin Genetics Inc


Interleukin Genetics Inc

135 Beaver St. 
Waltham MA 02452 United States
Phone: +1 781-___-____
Fax: +1 781-___-____
http://www.ilgenetics.com





4
Managers




1
IT employees




$226.0KEST.
IT Budget




Interleukin Genetics Inc is a developer and marketer of genetic tests and other personalized consumer health products. It is based in Waltham, Massachusetts.






Sector (Industry)
Consumer Goods (Consumer Products Manufacturers)


Employees
27


Revenue
$2.5M


FYE
12/31




Breaking news on investment signals




Date
Type
Inside Scoop




2015-08-25
Technology Updates
Topic: Web Analytics.
Company: Interleukin Genetics Inc, Waltham, MA
Opportunity: Deployed GetClicky in the last 60 Days.







Want full access to this profile and more?
RainKing's clients have access to over 1,500 new investment signals published daily, which provide insights on spending initiatives, pain points, management changes and more from companies around the globe. Interested in becoming a client?
Request a demo
Request a quote




Technologies currently being used

IT
Marketing


Data Analytics/ Databases

Relational Databases
Microsoft SQL Server

Web Analytics
ClickyGoogle Universal AnalyticsUrchin
Data Infrastructure

Email Hosting
International Business Machines (mail server)MXSave A Wamo (mail server)MXSave A Wamo, LLC Company (mail server)

IaaS
Amazon (cloud)Amazon EC2Amazon Web ServicesRackspace (cloud)

Server and Operating Systems
Apache HTTPDApache ServerApache TomcatGitHubMicrosoft IIS
Enterprise/ ERP

CRM
SalesForce
Information Mgmt

Content Management
WordPressYouTube

User Experience
FacebookMicrosoft SharePoint Server
Information Security

Secure Gateway
Starfield Technologies (SSL)
This is just a subset of the full Technolgies being used by this company.
Analytics

Marketing Data Management
Microsoft SQL Server

Social Analytics
PHP

Web Analytics
ClickyGoogle Universal Analytics
eCommerce

Online Retailing
Apache ServerWordPress

Social Commerce
Amazon (cloud)Amazon Web ServicesGitHubRackspace (cloud)
Sales/ Mktg Automation

Email Marketing
International Business Machines (mail server)MXSave A Wamo, LLC Company (mail server)

Lead Management
SalesForce
Social

Social Applications
YouTube
This is just a subset of the full Technolgies being used by this company.



Become a RainKing power-user today!
RainKing's rich data provides clients with a deeper understanding of who will be making – and what will be driving – upcoming investments in IT. Know what your prospects are planning before your competition does, and beat them to the negotiating table.
Request a demo
Request a quote




Org chart of IT decision makers




Mark Carbeau
Chief Executive Officer (CEO)
___@ilgenetics.com
+1 781-___-____






Steve DiPalma
Chief Financial Officer (CFO)
___@ilgenetics.com
+1 508-___-____







Kenneth Kornman
President and Chief Scientific Officer
___@ilgenetics.com
+1 781-___-____









Stephan Toutain
Chief Commercial Officer
___@ilgenetics.com
+1 781-___-____



This is just a subset of the full Org Chart for this company.


Want access to this and more? Become a client today!
RainKing clients get access to all 615 decision makers in this company's org chart.
Request a demo
Request a quote








Want full access to this profile and more?
RainKing's clients have access to over 1,500 new investment signals published daily, which provide insights on spending initiatives, pain points, management changes and more from companies around the globe. Interested in becoming a client?
Request a demo
Request a quote









To receive a FREE PDF of this company, simply fill out the form below










Get your free company profile




Search





Subscribe to our newsletter



Connect with Us
 





 





 





 





 







 




7700 Old Georgetown Road
Bethesda, MD 20814-6100
1.866.592.7122
contactus@rainkingonline.com


 Sitemap Terms of Use Privacy Policy 


©2017 RainKing





ILIU Stock Price - Interleukin Genetics Inc. Stock Quote (U.S.: OTC) - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











DJIA F

21,501


-17


-0.08%











S&P F

2,466.75


-2.75


-0.11%











NASDAQ F

5,912.75


-6.00


-0.10%











Gold

1,263.00


2.00


0.16%











Silver

16.505


0.048


0.29%











Crude Oil

46.13


0.36


0.79%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



CTAS 
9.2




COF 
8.6




ETFC 
5.1




SYF 
4.5






HP
-5.5




ISRG
-4.6




HBAN
-4.4




CHK
-3.1














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








7:30a

WebMD's stock resumes trade, rockets 20% premarket after buyout deal



7:30a

Hibbett Sports down 7% premarket after trading halt lifted



7:29a

Mersana Therapeutics started at overweight with $23 stock price target at J.P. Morgan



7:28a

Brighthouse Financial started at neutral with $78 stock price target at J.P. Morgan



7:28a

Updated
Black swans? Here’s why the recent global breakout in stocks should NOT be trusted



7:28a

Michaels Cos. upgraded to overweight from neutral at J.P. Morgan



7:25a

Updated
Exxon earnings: Will stock trade higher on expected second-quarter beat?



7:24a

Dova Pharmaceuticals started at market perform with $24 stock price target at Leerink



7:23a

Huntsman upgraded to overweight from sector weight at KeyBanc Capital



7:23a

Union Pacific stock price target raised to $118 from $112 at Stifel Nicolaus












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Stocks


United States


ILIU


Overview



Compare Quotes
Stock Screener
Earnings Calendar
Sectors

 



ILIU
U.S.: OTC


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Interleukin Genetics Inc.

Watchlist 
CreateILIUAlert



  


Closed

Last Updated: Jul 21, 2017 5:19 p.m. EDT
Delayed quote



$
0.0122



0.00
0.00%






Previous Close




$0.0122





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




29.48% vs Avg.




                Volume:               
                
                    27.9K
                


                65 Day Avg. - 94.7K
            





Open: 0.0121
Close: 0.0122



0.0121
Day Low/High
0.0122





Day Range



0.0088
52 Week Low/High
0.2500


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Profile


News


Charts


Financials


Historical Quotes


Analyst Estimates


Options


SEC Filings


Insiders



   




Key Data



Open
$0.0121



Day Range
0.0121 - 0.0122



52 Week Range
0.0088 - 0.2500



Market Cap
$2.8M



Shares Outstanding
229.47M



Public Float
44.64M



Beta
n/a



Rev. per Employee
n/a



P/E Ratio
n/a



EPS
$-0.04



Yield
n/a



Dividend
n/a



Ex-Dividend Date
n/a



Short Interest
n/a
n/a


% of Float Shorted
n/a



Average Volume
94.68K




 


Performance




5 Day


35.56%







1 Month


-79.63%







3 Month


-87.54%







YTD


-88.90%







1 Year


-87.80%









  

 
 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones




No Headlines Available











Genetics Test Helps Predict Weight-Loss Success, Study Says

Mar. 3, 2010 at 2:02 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Noted ...


Apr. 4, 2006 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Technology
Briefs


Jun. 5, 2001 at 2:03 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal














Recent News



Other News
Press Releases






10-Q: INTERLEUKIN GENETICS INC
10-Q: INTERLEUKIN GENETICS INC

May. 11, 2017 at 5:02 p.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





10-K: INTERLEUKIN GENETICS INC


Apr. 17, 2017 at 5:33 p.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Mark Baum on Q3 2016 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


Nov. 15, 2016 at 11:11 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Mark Carbeau on Q2 2016 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


Aug. 16, 2016 at 1:29 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





10-Q: INTERLEUKIN GENETICS INC


Aug. 15, 2016 at 4:57 p.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





InsiderInsights.com Daily Round Up 8/3/16: CB Richard Ellis Group, Shake Shack, Grubhub


Aug. 4, 2016 at 1:44 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





InsiderInsights.com Daily Round Up 8/2/16: SXC, INFN, CTIB, ILIU


Aug. 3, 2016 at 12:09 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Mark Carbeau on Q1 2016 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


May. 16, 2016 at 10:52 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Eleven Biotherapeutics: A Buyout Likely Coming


May. 16, 2016 at 9:41 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Eleven Bio continues up move on renewed optimism for isunakinra; shares up 35%


May. 4, 2016 at 11:58 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Mark Carbeau on Q4 2015 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


Mar. 17, 2016 at 1:01 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Mark Carbeau on Q2 2015 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


Aug. 14, 2015 at 11:35 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Premarket Biotech Digest: Lure Of Startups, Geron's Short Squeeze, New ODDs


Jul. 16, 2015 at 8:36 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Interleukin's (ILIU) CEO Mark Carbeau on Q1 2015 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


May. 15, 2015 at 10:21 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Kenneth Kornman on Q4 2014 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


Mar. 20, 2015 at 2:00 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





InsiderInsights.com Daily Round Up 12/29/14: REGN, VRML, OAS, PTBI


Dec. 30, 2014 at 1:23 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO, Kenneth Kornman on Q3 2014 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


Nov. 14, 2014 at 11:24 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Ken Kornman on Q2 2014 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


Aug. 13, 2014 at 10:15 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics CEO Discusses Q4 2013 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


Mar. 20, 2014 at 11:05 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





PST Manuscript Submitted, Awaiting Publication Acceptance - Analyst Blog


May. 17, 2013 at 4:04 p.m. ET
on Zacks.com









Interleukin Genetics To Explore Strategic Alternatives, Reduce Workforce
Interleukin Genetics To Explore Strategic Alternatives, Reduce Workforce

Jul. 3, 2017 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Reports First Quarter 2017 Financial Results
Interleukin Genetics Reports First Quarter 2017 Financial Results

May. 12, 2017 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Reports Fourth Quarter and Year-End 2016 Financial Results


Apr. 18, 2017 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin-1 Genotypes Are Predictive of Cardiovascular Events  in Patients With Elevated Lipoprotein (a)


Mar. 20, 2017 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Signs Second Employer Agreement in Pittsburgh Region


Mar. 13, 2017 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Establishes Partnership with Greater Philadelphia Business Coalition on Health


Mar. 2, 2017 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Deploys ILUSTRA(TM) Inflammation Management Program with mPulse Mobile Employees


Feb. 23, 2017 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics and Pittsburgh Business Group on Health Forge Relationship to Bring the ILUSTRA(TM) Inflammation Management Program to Pittsburgh Area Employers


Feb. 15, 2017 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Reports Third Quarter 2016 Financial Results


Nov. 15, 2016 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Announces Conference Call to Discuss Third Quarter 2016 Financial Results


Nov. 9, 2016 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Launches The ILUSTRA(TM) Inflammation Management Program


Nov. 3, 2016 at 8:02 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Cites Role in Key Antisense Drug Trial Published in The Lancet


Sep. 22, 2016 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin-1 Genetic Variations Influence Obesity Effect in Periodontal Disease Progression


Aug. 23, 2016 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Reports Second Quarter 2016 Financial Results


Aug. 16, 2016 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Announces Conference Call to Discuss Second Quarter 2016 Financial Results


Aug. 9, 2016 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Strengthens Commercial Leadership with Key Appointments


Aug. 3, 2016 at 8:02 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics, Inc. Announces $5.6 Million Private Placement Financing


Aug. 1, 2016 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire











Interleukin Genetics Inc.


            
            Interleukin Genetics, Inc. is a molecular diagnostics company which develops and commercializes genetic tests to guide better prevention and treatment of chronic diseases of aging. Its products include PrioPredict Genetic Risk Test, and Inherent Health. The company was founded by Kenneth S. Kornman in 1986 and is headquartered in Waltham, MA.

            
            (See Full Profile)


  



 


Competitors




Name
Chg %
Market Cap




Myriad Genetics Inc.
-0.66%
$1.65B


Psychemedics Corp.
1.66%
$143.65M


Genomic Health Inc.
-0.84%
$1.13B


Radnet Inc.
0.66%
$361.21M


Quest Diagnostics Inc.
-0.24%
$14.97B




Competitor Data Provided By


   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





APRN

0.46%








HAL

-2.20%








ARNC

1.86%








VFC

1.63%








SRPT

6.06%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.













Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Open in:



Market Snapshot
Analyst Ratings
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




7:32 AM EDT
July 24, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Pre


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Open


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
7:32aNektar Therapeutics stock halted premarket 
7:32aThis app will analyze your DNA to help you lose weight
7:31aWebMD's stock resumes trade, rockets 20% premarket after buyout deal
7:31aHibbett Sports down 7% premarket after trading halt lifted
7:29aMersana Therapeutics started at overweight with $23 stock price target at J.P. Morgan
7:29aBrighthouse Financial started at neutral with $78 stock price target at J.P. Morgan
7:29aBlack swans? Here’s why the recent global breakout in stocks should NOT be trusted
7:28aMichaels Cos. upgraded to overweight from neutral at J.P. Morgan
7:26aExxon earnings: Will stock trade higher on expected second-quarter beat?
7:25aDova Pharmaceuticals started at market perform with $24 stock price target at Leerink
7:24aHuntsman upgraded to overweight from sector weight at KeyBanc Capital
7:23aUnion Pacific stock price target raised to $118 from $112 at Stifel Nicolaus
7:23aCSX stock price target raised to $57 from $50 at Stifel Nicolaus
7:22aChipotle earnings: Media coverage of the latest illness scare will put earnings targets at risk
7:22aBlue Apron started at buy with $10 stock price target at Stifel Nicolaus
7:20aVF Corp. shares rise after earnings, revenue beat expectations
7:18aAlphabet earnings: A $2.74 billion hit for Google, potential YouTube results for investors
7:17aGilead stock surges 0.7% on late-stage HIV trial results
7:17aGilead Sciences says late-stage results for HIV drug combination are similar to standard of care
7:16aKKR's stock jumps 3.2% premarket after WebMD buyout deal
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,580.07

-31.71
-0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,387.75

-2.25
-0.04%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.54

-0.91
-0.04%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Open in:



Market Snapshot
Analyst Ratings
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




7:32 AM EDT
July 24, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Pre


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Open


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
7:32aThis app will analyze your DNA to help you lose weight
7:31aWebMD's stock resumes trade, rockets 20% premarket after buyout deal
7:31aHibbett Sports down 7% premarket after trading halt lifted
7:29aMersana Therapeutics started at overweight with $23 stock price target at J.P. Morgan
7:29aBrighthouse Financial started at neutral with $78 stock price target at J.P. Morgan
7:29aBlack swans? Here’s why the recent global breakout in stocks should NOT be trusted
7:28aMichaels Cos. upgraded to overweight from neutral at J.P. Morgan
7:26aExxon earnings: Will stock trade higher on expected second-quarter beat?
7:25aDova Pharmaceuticals started at market perform with $24 stock price target at Leerink
7:24aHuntsman upgraded to overweight from sector weight at KeyBanc Capital
7:23aUnion Pacific stock price target raised to $118 from $112 at Stifel Nicolaus
7:23aCSX stock price target raised to $57 from $50 at Stifel Nicolaus
7:22aChipotle earnings: Media coverage of the latest illness scare will put earnings targets at risk
7:22aBlue Apron started at buy with $10 stock price target at Stifel Nicolaus
7:20aVF Corp. shares rise after earnings, revenue beat expectations
7:18aAlphabet earnings: A $2.74 billion hit for Google, potential YouTube results for investors
7:17aGilead stock surges 0.7% on late-stage HIV trial results
7:17aGilead Sciences says late-stage results for HIV drug combination are similar to standard of care
7:16aKKR's stock jumps 3.2% premarket after WebMD buyout deal
7:15aVF Corp. shares up 2.3% premarket
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,580.07

-31.71
-0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,387.75

-2.25
-0.04%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.54

-0.91
-0.04%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Stocks/Country/United States Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Open in:



Market Snapshot
Analyst Ratings
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Location: United States



Name
Exchange
Sector




01 Communique Laboratory Inc. (OCQLF)
OOTC
Software


1347 Property Insurance Holdings Inc. (PIH)
XNAS
Non-Life Insurance


1-800-FLOWERS.COM Inc. Cl A (FLWS)
XNAS
Specialty Retail


1pm Industries Inc. (OPMZ)
OOTC
Food Products


1st Capital Bank (CA) (FISB)
OOTC
Banking


1st Constitution Bancorp (FCCY)
XNAS
Banking


1st NRG Corp. (FNRC)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


1st Source Corp. (SRCE)
XNAS
Banking


2050 Motors Inc. (ETFM)
OOTC
Automobiles


21st Century Fox Inc. Cl A (FOXA)
XNAS
Broadcasting


21st Century Fox Inc. Cl B (FOX)
XNAS
Broadcasting


21Vianet Group Inc. ADR (VNET)
XNAS
Internet/Online


22nd Century Group Inc. (XXII)
XASE
Biotechnology


24/7 Kid Doc Inc. (TVMD)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


2U Inc. (TWOU)
XNAS
Software


2xLeveraged Long E-TRACS Linked to Wells Fargo Business Development Co. Index 052441 (BDCL)
ARCX
Major International Banks


2xLeveraged Long ETRACS Wells Fargo Business Development (LBDC)
ARCX
Major International Banks


3D Eye Solutions Inc. (TDEY)
OOTC
Motion Picture/Sound Recording


3D Pioneer Systems Inc. (DPSM)
OOTC
Software


3D Systems Corp. (DDD)
XNYS
Computers/Consumer Electronics


3DIcon Corp. (TDCP)
OOTC
Software


3Dshopping.com (THDS)
OOTC
Mixed Retailing


3DX Industries Inc. (DDDX)
OOTC
Computers/Consumer Electronics


3i Group PLC ADR (TGOPY)
OOTC
Finance Companies


3M Co. (MMM)
XNYS
Diversified Holding Companies


3Pea International Inc. (TPNL)
XOTC
Accounting


3Power Energy Group Inc. (PSPW)
OOTC
Renewable Energy Generation


3TL Technologies Corp. (TTMZF)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


420 Property Management Inc. (FTPM)
OOTC
Real Estate Agents/Brokers


4Cable TV International Inc. (CATV)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


4Licensing Corp. (FOURQ)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


500.com Ltd. ADR (WBAI)
XNYS
Gambling Industries


51job Inc. ADR (JOBS)
XNAS
Employment/Training Services


58.com Inc. ADR (WUBA)
XNYS
Consumer Services


5Barz International Inc. (BARZ)
OOTC
Networking


5N Plus Inc. (FPLSF)
OOTC
Commodity Chemicals


6D Global Technologies Inc. (SIXD)
OOTC
Computer Services


808 Renewable Energy Corp. (RNWR)
OOTC
Multiutilities


88 Energy Ltd. ADR (TNGRY)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


888 Holdings PLC (EIHDF)
OOTC
Gambling Industries


8Point3 Energy Partners LP (CAFD)
XNAS
Renewable Energy Generation


8X8 Inc. (EGHT)
XNAS
Wired Telecommunications Services


A Clean Slate Inc. (DRWN)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


A&W Revenue Royalties Income Fund (AWRRF)
OOTC
Restaurants


A. H. Belo Corp. Series A (AHC)
XNYS
Publishing


A. Schulman Inc. (SHLM)
XNAS
Commodity Chemicals


A. Schulman Inc. 6% Pfd. (SLMNP)
OOTC
Commodity Chemicals


A.D. Makepeace Co. (MAKE)
OOTC
Farming


A.M. Castle & Co. (CAS)
XNYS
Wholesalers


A.O. Smith Corp. (AOS)
XNYS
Building Materials/Products


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S ADR (AMKBY)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S Series A (AMKAF)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S Series B (AMKBF)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.S. Roma S.p.A. (ASRAF)
OOTC
Recreational Services


A-1 Group Inc. (AWON)
OOTC
Tobacco


A10 Networks Inc. (ATEN)
XNYS
Computer Services


a2 Milk Co. Ltd. (ACOPF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


AAC Holdings Inc. (AAC)
XNYS
Healthcare Provision


AAC Technologies Holdings Inc. (AACAF)
OOTC
Industrial Electronics


AAC Technologies Holdings Inc. ADR (AACAY)
OOTC
Industrial Electronics


AAON Inc. (AAON)
XNAS
Building Materials/Products


AAP Inc. (AAPJ)
OOTC
Food Products


AAR Corp. (AIR)
XNYS
Aerospace Products/Parts


Aaron's Inc. (AAN)
XNYS
Consumer Services


AB Science S.A. (ABSCF)
OOTC
Pharmaceuticals


AB Svensk Exportkredit ELEMENTS linked to MLCX Biofuels Index Total Return (FUE)
ARCX
Finance Companies


AB Svensk Exportkredit ELEMENTS linked to MLCX Grain Index Total Return (GRU)
ARCX
Finance Companies


AB&T Financial Corp. (ABTO)
OOTC
Banking


Abacus Mining & Exploration Corp. (ABCFF)
OOTC
General Mining


Abakan Inc. (ABKI)
OOTC
Industrial Products


Abattis Bioceuticals Corp. (ATTBF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Abaxis Inc. (ABAX)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


ABB Ltd. (ABLZF)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


ABB Ltd. ADR (ABB)
XNYS
Industrial Machinery


Abbott Laboratories (ABT)
XNYS
Pharmaceuticals


AbbVie Inc. (ABBV)
XNYS
Biotechnology


Abby Inc. (ABBY)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


Abcam PLC (ABCZF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Abcam PLC ADR (ABCZY)
OOTC
Biotechnology


ABCO Energy Inc. (ABCE)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


Abcourt Mines Inc. (ABMBF)
OOTC
General Mining


Aben Resources Ltd. (ABNAF)
OOTC
General Mining


Abengoa S.A. B (AGOAF)
OOTC
Construction


Abeona Therapeutics Inc. (ABEO)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Abeona Therapeutics Inc. Wt (ABEOW)
XNAS



Abercrombie & Fitch Co. (ANF)
XNYS
Clothing Retail


Aberdeen Asia-Pacific Income Fund Inc. (FAX)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Asia-Pacific Income Investment Co. Ltd. (ABAKF)
OOTC
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Asset Management PLC (ABDNF)
OOTC
Investment Advisors


Aberdeen Asset Management PLC ADR (ABDNY)
OOTC
Investment Advisors


Aberdeen Australia Equity Fund Inc. (IAF)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Chile Fund Inc. (CH)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Emerging Markets Smaller Company Opportunities Fund Inc. (ABE)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Global Income Fund Inc. (FCO)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Greater China Fund Inc. (GCH)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Indonesia Fund Inc. (IF)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen International Inc. (AABVF)
OOTC
General Mining


Aberdeen Israel Fund Inc. (ISL)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc. (JEQ)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Latin America Equity Fund Inc. (LAQ)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Singapore Fund Inc. (SGF)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Abertis Infraestructuras S.A. ADR (ABRTY)
OOTC
Transportation Services


Ability Inc. (ABIL)
XNAS
Precision Products


Ability Inc. Wt (ABIWF)
OOTC



Abiomed Inc. (ABMD)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


Abitibi Royalties Inc. (ATBYF)
OOTC
General Mining


Able Energy Inc. (ABLE)
OOTC
Gas Utilities


Ablynx N.V. (ABLYF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


ABM Industries Inc. (ABM)
XNYS
Diversified Business Services


Abraxas Petroleum Corp. (AXAS)
XNAS
Oil Extraction


Absecon Bancorp (ASCN)
OOTC
Banking


Absolute Health & Fitness Inc. (AHFI)
OOTC
Recreational Services


Absolute Software Corp. (ALSWF)
OOTC
Software


ABT Holdings Inc. (ABOT)
OOTC
Precious Metals


Abtech Holdings Inc. (ABHD)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


ABV Consulting Inc. (ABVN)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


AC Immune S.A. (ACIU)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Acacia Communications Inc. (ACIA)
XNAS
Networking


Acacia Diversified Holdings Inc. (ACCA)
OOTC
Specialty Retail


Acacia Mining PLC (ABGLF)
OOTC
Gold


Acacia Research Corp. - Acacia Technologies (ACTG)
XNAS
Diversified Business Services


Acadia Healthcare Co. Inc. (ACHC)
XNAS
Healthcare Provision


ACADIA Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACAD)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Acadia Realty Trust (AKR)
XNYS



Acadian Timber Corp. (ACAZF)
OOTC
Forestry & Wood Products


Acasti Pharma Inc. (ACST)
XNAS
Pharmaceuticals


Accelera Innovations Inc. (ACNV)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


Accelerate Diagnostics Inc. (AXDX)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Accelerize Inc. (ACLZ)
XOTC
Life Insurance


Acceleron Pharma Inc. (XLRN)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Accenture PLC Cl A (ACN)
XNYS
Diversified Business Services


Access National Corp. (ANCX)
XNAS
Banking


Access Power Inc. (ACCR)
OOTC
Wired Telecommunications Services


Access Worldwide Communications Inc. (AWWC)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


Acciona S.A. (ACXIF)
OOTC
Construction


ACCO Brands Corp. (ACCO)
XNYS
Nondurable Household Products


Accor S.A. (ACRFF)
OOTC
Hotels


Accor S.A. ADR (ACCYY)
OOTC
Hotels


Accordia Golf Co. Ltd. (ACGFF)
OOTC
Recreational Services


Accredited Mortgage Loan REIT Trust 9.75% Perp. Cum. Pfd. Series A (AHHAP)
OOTC
Mortgages


Accretive Health Inc. (ACHI)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


Accuray Inc. (ARAY)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


Accuride Corp. (ACW)
XNYS
Auto & Commercial Vehicle Parts


AcelRx Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACRX)
XNAS
Pharmaceuticals


Acer Inc. GDR Reg S (ACEYY)
OOTC
Computers/Consumer Electronics


Acerus Pharmaceuticals Corp. (TRLPF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Aceto Corp. (ACET)
XNAS
Specialty Chemicals


Achaogen Inc. (AKAO)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Achillion Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACHN)
XNAS
Biotechnology


ACI Worldwide Inc. (ACIW)
XNAS
Software



«1234567891011-2021-3031-4041-5051-6061-7071-8081-9091-94»










Log In




7:32 AM EDT
July 24, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Pre


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Open


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
7:32aThis app will analyze your DNA to help you lose weight
7:31aWebMD's stock resumes trade, rockets 20% premarket after buyout deal
7:31aHibbett Sports down 7% premarket after trading halt lifted
7:29aMersana Therapeutics started at overweight with $23 stock price target at J.P. Morgan
7:29aBrighthouse Financial started at neutral with $78 stock price target at J.P. Morgan
7:29aBlack swans? Here’s why the recent global breakout in stocks should NOT be trusted
7:28aMichaels Cos. upgraded to overweight from neutral at J.P. Morgan
7:26aExxon earnings: Will stock trade higher on expected second-quarter beat?
7:25aDova Pharmaceuticals started at market perform with $24 stock price target at Leerink
7:24aHuntsman upgraded to overweight from sector weight at KeyBanc Capital
7:23aUnion Pacific stock price target raised to $118 from $112 at Stifel Nicolaus
7:23aCSX stock price target raised to $57 from $50 at Stifel Nicolaus
7:22aChipotle earnings: Media coverage of the latest illness scare will put earnings targets at risk
7:22aBlue Apron started at buy with $10 stock price target at Stifel Nicolaus
7:20aVF Corp. shares rise after earnings, revenue beat expectations
7:18aAlphabet earnings: A $2.74 billion hit for Google, potential YouTube results for investors
7:17aGilead stock surges 0.7% on late-stage HIV trial results
7:17aGilead Sciences says late-stage results for HIV drug combination are similar to standard of care
7:16aKKR's stock jumps 3.2% premarket after WebMD buyout deal
7:15aVF Corp. shares up 2.3% premarket
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,580.07

-31.71
-0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,387.75

-2.25
-0.04%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.54

-0.91
-0.04%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































ILIU Stock Price - Interleukin Genetics Inc. Stock Quote (U.S.: OTC) - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











DJIA F

21,501


-17


-0.08%











S&P F

2,466.75


-2.75


-0.11%











NASDAQ F

5,912.75


-6.00


-0.10%











Gold

1,263.00


2.00


0.16%











Silver

16.505


0.048


0.29%











Crude Oil

46.13


0.36


0.79%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



CTAS 
9.2




COF 
8.6




ETFC 
5.1




SYF 
4.5






HP
-5.5




ISRG
-4.6




HBAN
-4.4




CHK
-3.1














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








7:30a

WebMD's stock resumes trade, rockets 20% premarket after buyout deal



7:30a

Hibbett Sports down 7% premarket after trading halt lifted



7:29a

Mersana Therapeutics started at overweight with $23 stock price target at J.P. Morgan



7:28a

Brighthouse Financial started at neutral with $78 stock price target at J.P. Morgan



7:28a

Updated
Black swans? Here’s why the recent global breakout in stocks should NOT be trusted



7:28a

Michaels Cos. upgraded to overweight from neutral at J.P. Morgan



7:25a

Updated
Exxon earnings: Will stock trade higher on expected second-quarter beat?



7:24a

Dova Pharmaceuticals started at market perform with $24 stock price target at Leerink



7:23a

Huntsman upgraded to overweight from sector weight at KeyBanc Capital



7:23a

Union Pacific stock price target raised to $118 from $112 at Stifel Nicolaus












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Stocks


United States


ILIU


Overview



Compare Quotes
Stock Screener
Earnings Calendar
Sectors

 



ILIU
U.S.: OTC


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Interleukin Genetics Inc.

Watchlist 
CreateILIUAlert



  


Closed

Last Updated: Jul 21, 2017 5:19 p.m. EDT
Delayed quote



$
0.0122



0.00
0.00%






Previous Close




$0.0122





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




29.48% vs Avg.




                Volume:               
                
                    27.9K
                


                65 Day Avg. - 94.7K
            





Open: 0.0121
Close: 0.0122



0.0121
Day Low/High
0.0122





Day Range



0.0088
52 Week Low/High
0.2500


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Profile


News


Charts


Financials


Historical Quotes


Analyst Estimates


Options


SEC Filings


Insiders



   




Key Data



Open
$0.0121



Day Range
0.0121 - 0.0122



52 Week Range
0.0088 - 0.2500



Market Cap
$2.8M



Shares Outstanding
229.47M



Public Float
44.64M



Beta
n/a



Rev. per Employee
n/a



P/E Ratio
n/a



EPS
$-0.04



Yield
n/a



Dividend
n/a



Ex-Dividend Date
n/a



Short Interest
n/a
n/a


% of Float Shorted
n/a



Average Volume
94.68K




 


Performance




5 Day


35.56%







1 Month


-79.63%







3 Month


-87.54%







YTD


-88.90%







1 Year


-87.80%









  

 
 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones




No Headlines Available











Genetics Test Helps Predict Weight-Loss Success, Study Says

Mar. 3, 2010 at 2:02 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Noted ...


Apr. 4, 2006 at 12:01 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Technology
Briefs


Jun. 5, 2001 at 2:03 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal














Recent News



Other News
Press Releases






10-Q: INTERLEUKIN GENETICS INC
10-Q: INTERLEUKIN GENETICS INC

May. 11, 2017 at 5:02 p.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





10-K: INTERLEUKIN GENETICS INC


Apr. 17, 2017 at 5:33 p.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Mark Baum on Q3 2016 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


Nov. 15, 2016 at 11:11 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Mark Carbeau on Q2 2016 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


Aug. 16, 2016 at 1:29 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





10-Q: INTERLEUKIN GENETICS INC


Aug. 15, 2016 at 4:57 p.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





InsiderInsights.com Daily Round Up 8/3/16: CB Richard Ellis Group, Shake Shack, Grubhub


Aug. 4, 2016 at 1:44 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





InsiderInsights.com Daily Round Up 8/2/16: SXC, INFN, CTIB, ILIU


Aug. 3, 2016 at 12:09 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Mark Carbeau on Q1 2016 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


May. 16, 2016 at 10:52 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Eleven Biotherapeutics: A Buyout Likely Coming


May. 16, 2016 at 9:41 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Eleven Bio continues up move on renewed optimism for isunakinra; shares up 35%


May. 4, 2016 at 11:58 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Mark Carbeau on Q4 2015 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


Mar. 17, 2016 at 1:01 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Mark Carbeau on Q2 2015 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


Aug. 14, 2015 at 11:35 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Premarket Biotech Digest: Lure Of Startups, Geron's Short Squeeze, New ODDs


Jul. 16, 2015 at 8:36 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Interleukin's (ILIU) CEO Mark Carbeau on Q1 2015 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


May. 15, 2015 at 10:21 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Kenneth Kornman on Q4 2014 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


Mar. 20, 2015 at 2:00 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





InsiderInsights.com Daily Round Up 12/29/14: REGN, VRML, OAS, PTBI


Dec. 30, 2014 at 1:23 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO, Kenneth Kornman on Q3 2014 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


Nov. 14, 2014 at 11:24 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics' (ILIU) CEO Ken Kornman on Q2 2014 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


Aug. 13, 2014 at 10:15 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Interleukin Genetics CEO Discusses Q4 2013 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


Mar. 20, 2014 at 11:05 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





PST Manuscript Submitted, Awaiting Publication Acceptance - Analyst Blog


May. 17, 2013 at 4:04 p.m. ET
on Zacks.com









Interleukin Genetics To Explore Strategic Alternatives, Reduce Workforce
Interleukin Genetics To Explore Strategic Alternatives, Reduce Workforce

Jul. 3, 2017 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Reports First Quarter 2017 Financial Results
Interleukin Genetics Reports First Quarter 2017 Financial Results

May. 12, 2017 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Reports Fourth Quarter and Year-End 2016 Financial Results


Apr. 18, 2017 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin-1 Genotypes Are Predictive of Cardiovascular Events  in Patients With Elevated Lipoprotein (a)


Mar. 20, 2017 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Signs Second Employer Agreement in Pittsburgh Region


Mar. 13, 2017 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Establishes Partnership with Greater Philadelphia Business Coalition on Health


Mar. 2, 2017 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Deploys ILUSTRA(TM) Inflammation Management Program with mPulse Mobile Employees


Feb. 23, 2017 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics and Pittsburgh Business Group on Health Forge Relationship to Bring the ILUSTRA(TM) Inflammation Management Program to Pittsburgh Area Employers


Feb. 15, 2017 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Reports Third Quarter 2016 Financial Results


Nov. 15, 2016 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Announces Conference Call to Discuss Third Quarter 2016 Financial Results


Nov. 9, 2016 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Launches The ILUSTRA(TM) Inflammation Management Program


Nov. 3, 2016 at 8:02 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Cites Role in Key Antisense Drug Trial Published in The Lancet


Sep. 22, 2016 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin-1 Genetic Variations Influence Obesity Effect in Periodontal Disease Progression


Aug. 23, 2016 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Reports Second Quarter 2016 Financial Results


Aug. 16, 2016 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Announces Conference Call to Discuss Second Quarter 2016 Financial Results


Aug. 9, 2016 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics Strengthens Commercial Leadership with Key Appointments


Aug. 3, 2016 at 8:02 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Interleukin Genetics, Inc. Announces $5.6 Million Private Placement Financing


Aug. 1, 2016 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire











Interleukin Genetics Inc.


            
            Interleukin Genetics, Inc. is a molecular diagnostics company which develops and commercializes genetic tests to guide better prevention and treatment of chronic diseases of aging. Its products include PrioPredict Genetic Risk Test, and Inherent Health. The company was founded by Kenneth S. Kornman in 1986 and is headquartered in Waltham, MA.

            
            (See Full Profile)


  



 


Competitors




Name
Chg %
Market Cap




Myriad Genetics Inc.
-0.66%
$1.65B


Psychemedics Corp.
1.66%
$143.65M


Genomic Health Inc.
-0.84%
$1.13B


Radnet Inc.
0.66%
$361.21M


Quest Diagnostics Inc.
-0.24%
$14.97B




Competitor Data Provided By


   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





APRN

0.46%








HAL

-2.20%








ARNC

1.86%








VFC

1.63%








SRPT

6.06%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.















BBB Business Profile | Interleukin Genetics, Inc.

























Home
 > 
Business Directory
 > 
Laboratories - Testing
 > 
Interleukin Genetics, Inc.














This Business Is Not BBB Accredited



                            Is this your business? 
                                Claim it now.








Interleukin Genetics, Inc.



Submit a Review

































Interleukin Genetics, Inc.






            Business Information
        






(781) 398-0700

Interleukin Genetics, Inc.
31 years in business

        135 Beaver St
        Waltham, MA 02452-8412
    




                 WEBSITE
            





Find a Location






                BBB File Opened: 10/11/2006
            

                Business Started: 01/01/1986


                Business Incorporated: 07/28/2000 in MA





            Type of Entity
             
            Corporation       
    



            Business Management
        


                    Dr. Kenneth Kornman, President/CSO
                






            Business Category
        


                Laboratories - Testing
            




                            NAICS: Medical Laboratories
                        

                            Biomedical Products - Research
                        




See More Business Categories
See Less Business Categories












                    Number of Employees: 
                
                22
            



See Less Business Information
See More Business Information


 








            Business Information
        






                    A+
                


                BBB Rating Scorecard
            






Overview


Interleukin Genetics, Inc. is a testing laboratory offering three genetic tests; 1)PST susceptibility tset for periodontal disease and 2) two genetic predictive tests; a heart health genetic test and a general nutrition genetic test.   The company was established in Texas and incorporated in Delaware in 1986.  There are 22 employees.   Dr. Kenneth Kornman is the President and Chief Scientific Officer of the company.  Mr. Gregg Mayer is the Chief Business Officer and Dr. Ramon Mohanlal is the Chief Medical Officer.  Ms. Barbara Veresh is the Support Services Manager and any questions or problems should be directed to her attention.   The company policy states that distributors determine the refund policies.  For DNA tests processed in the lab, retest materials are provided at no charge to customers whose initial tests are inconclusive.

 












Share your experience


Submit a Review


Submit a Complaint










BBB Reason for Ratings


        BBB rating is based on 13 factors: Get the details about the factors considered.










BBB Reports On









Licensing









                        Licensing information is provided in the BBB Business Profiles to inform the public about industries that may require professional licensing, bonding, or registration. Better Business Bureau encourages you to check with the appropriate agency to be certain any requirements are currently being met.
                    





Advertising Review









                        BBB promotes truth in advertising by contacting advertisers whose claims conflict with the BBB Code of Advertising.  These claims come to our attention from our internal review of advertising, consumer complaints and competitor challenges.  BBB asks advertisers to substantiate their claims, change ads to make offers more clear to consumers, and remove misleading or deceptive statements.
                    





Government Actions









                        BBB reports on known significant government actions involving the business's marketplace conduct.
                    





Out of Business









                        BBB reports on a company that is out of business for three years from the date the company closes its doors or ceases to do business.
                    





Misuse of Better Business Bureau Name/Logo









                        BBB reports on unauthorized use of the Better Business Bureau's name and/or logo for as long as the business continues to use it in any advertising, or for one year after the business ceases any repeated unauthorized uses.
                    





Bankruptcy









                        BBB reports on a business’s bankruptcy as long as the business remains in bankruptcy.
                    





Mail Returned









                        BBB reports when mail sent to the business was returned by the Postal Service.
                    
























Interleukin Genetics, Inc.






            BBB Rating Scorecard
        






This Business Is Not BBB Accredited  

                Interleukin Genetics, Inc.
            










A+




BBB Rating System Overview














Customer Review Rating:









                        The BBB Customer Review Rating represents the customer's opinion of the business.
                        The Customer Review Rating percentages are based on the total number of positive,
                        neutral, and negative reviews posted.
                    


                        There are NO reviews for this business.Be the first to leave a review!
                    



                        This business has no complaints filed
                    

















Share your experience


Submit a Review


Submit a Complaint












Share




Print






































































×
Claim Your Business


                By claiming your Business Profile, businesses can add custom text or descriptive information about their services, insert company logos, and add photographs for consumers to view.
            

Close










×
AccreditedQuestionModal title


                content
            

Close










×
Customer Rating Modal title


                content
            

Close










×
Score Modal title


                content
            

Close











×
Find a Location







Filter







Close




 






























 

















Better Business Bureau Serving Eastern MA, ME, RI & VT






























 For full functionality of this site it is necessary to enable JavaScript.
 Here are the 
 instructions how to enable JavaScript in your web browser.
     











News




07/19/17


House Owners Starting To Feel The Heat To Hire An Air Conditioning Contractor



07/12/17


What to do if a Scammer Won't Stop Calling You



07/06/17


Jury Duty Scams That Can Cost You Thousands



06/21/17


The Pests That Come Along With Summer And How To Deal With Them



 More Local News »





                        Accredited Business Directory
                    












File a Complaint
GO NOW »







Auto Warranty Concerns?
FILE A CLAIM »







 Services








Write a Customer Review







Request Now







BBB Scam Tracker



















MORE »


BBB Military Line®

Consumer education and advocacy for Active Duty, National Guard, Reserve, DoD Civilians, Retirees and their families.









































BBB Search Database of Businesses, Charities, & News Items

















 For full functionality of this site it is necessary to enable JavaScript.
 Here are the 
 instructions how to enable JavaScript in your web browser.
     











No results found.   Ask BBB to develop a report on this business by clicking here.


BBB Search Tips
Use BBB's search bar above to check out businesses and charities from our comprehensive database of BBB Business Profiles. Enter any of the following into the search box:

Business or Charity Name
Website URL
Phone Number
Email Address

Or, select from the categories in the drop-list to search by Type of Business or Type of Charity.
Want to know more about our rating system? Find out more here. 
Need more info?  Try the search FAQs.






















































BBB Search Database of Businesses, Charities, & News Items

















 For full functionality of this site it is necessary to enable JavaScript.
 Here are the 
 instructions how to enable JavaScript in your web browser.
     











No results found.   Ask BBB to develop a report on this business by clicking here.


BBB Search Tips
Use BBB's search bar above to check out businesses and charities from our comprehensive database of BBB Business Profiles. Enter any of the following into the search box:

Business or Charity Name
Website URL
Phone Number
Email Address

Or, select from the categories in the drop-list to search by Type of Business or Type of Charity.
Want to know more about our rating system? Find out more here. 
Need more info?  Try the search FAQs.
















































  Interleukin Genetics                              IL-1 Genetic Patterns Translate Lp(a) Levels Into Cardiovascular EventsIn Patients with Elevated Lp(a), Recurrent Cardiovascular Events Are Conditional on Pro-Inflammatory IL-1 Genetic Patterns Watch Presentation Over 48 million U.S. adults have high Lipoprotein(a) levelsMost are unaware of their elevated risk for heart attackLearn More About Our Pipeline   Home Rene Oda 2017-04-03T17:21:14+00:00IL-1 Genetic Patterns & Lp(a)IL-1 genetic patterns translate Lp(a) levels into cardiovascular events. In patients with elevated Lp(a), recurrent cardiovascular events are conditional on pro-inflammatory IL-1 genetic patterns. Learn more in this presentation. Watch NowWhat is ILUSTRA?ILUSTRA is an innovative, integrated program that utilizes a simple genetic test to easily identify patients at elevated risk for developing severe periodontal disease due to a genetic tendency to over-produce inflammation. Learn MoreDevelopment PipelineOur patented IL-1 genetic risk test and our expanded cardiovascular genetic panel are providing key insights into prevention and treatment of cardiovascular disease and the overarching problems of systemic inflammation. Learn More                



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.


















Bing Places for Business
























































































































Bing
 places for business


Sign in using your




Microsoft Account





Work Account





Google Account





Facebook Account

Don't have an account? Create one.


